Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.570

Extracurricular activities—Goals for reducing the opportunity gap in participation.

For each high school, the opportunity gap in extracurricular activity participation, as calculated under RCW 28A.320.550, must not exceed the following goals:

(1) During the 2020-21 school year, the opportunity gap must be twenty or fewer percentage points;

(2) During the 2021-22 school year, the opportunity gap must be sixteen or fewer percentage points;

(3) During the 2022-23 school year, the opportunity gap must be twelve or fewer percentage points;

(4) During the 2023-24 school year, the opportunity gap must be eight or fewer percentage points; and

(5) During the 2024-25 school year, and for each subsequent school year, the opportunity gap must be five or fewer percentage points.

[ 2020 c 13 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 13: See note following RCW 28A.320.580.